Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.170

Condemnation for military purposes.

Whenever the governor, as commander-in-chief of the military of this state, shall deem it necessary to acquire any lands, real estate, premises, or other property for any military purpose or purposes of this state, either to add to, enlarge, increase, or otherwise improve state military facilities now or hereafter existing or to establish new facilities, the acquisition of which shall have been provided for by the state, by a county or by a city, or by either, all or any thereof, upon certificate by the governor of such necessity, proceedings for the condemnation, appropriation, and taking of the lands, real estate, premises, or other property so certified to be necessary shall be taken as follows:

Where the state is to pay the purchase price it shall be the duty of the attorney general, upon receipt by him or her of said certificate of the governor, to file a petition in the superior court for the county in which such lands, real estate, premises, or other property may be situate praying such condemnation, appropriating, and taking, which petition shall be prosecuted to a final determination in the manner by law provided for other condemnation suits brought by or on behalf of the state;

Where a county is to pay the purchase price it shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of said county upon receipt by him or her of said certificate of the governor, to file a petition in the superior court for said county praying such condemnation, appropriation, and taking, which petition shall be prosecuted to a final determination in the manner by law provided for other condemnation suits brought by or on behalf of a county;

Where a city is to pay the purchase price it shall be the duty of the corporation counsel, city attorney, or other head of the legal department of said city, upon receipt by him or her of said certificate of the governor, to file a petition in the superior court for the county in which said city is situate, praying such condemnation, appropriation, and taking, which petition shall be prosecuted to a final determination in the manner by law provided for other condemnation suits brought by or on behalf of such city;

Where the purchase price is to be paid by the state, a county, and a city or by the state and a county, or by the state and a city, or by a county and a city, the condemnation shall be prosecuted to a final determination in the manner by law provided for either or any thereof, as the governor may determine, which determination shall be final and conclusive.

[ 2011 c 336 s 257; 1917 c 153 s 1; RRS s 900-1.]

NOTES:

Notice where military land is involved: RCW 8.28.030.